Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 12 Consumer Protection

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17 Am. Jur. 2d Consumer and Borrower Protection § 1 et seq.

Right of state, public official or governmental entity to seek, or power of court to allow, restitution of fruits of consumer fraud, without specific statutory authorization, 55 ALR3d 198.

Right to private action under state consumer protection act, 62 ALR3d 169.

Scope and exceptions of state deceptive trade practice and consumer protection acts, 89 ALR3d 399; 77 ALR4th 991, 89 ALR4th 854.

Practices forbidden by state deceptive trade practice and consumer protection acts, 89 ALR3d 449.

Implied warranty coverage for service transactions under state consumer protection and deceptive trade statutes, 72 ALR4th 282.

Coverage of insurance transactions under state consumer protection statutes, 77 ALR4th 991, 89 ALR4th 854.

Constitutional right to jury trial in cause of action under state unfair or deceptive trade practices law, 54 ALR5th 631.

Who is a “consumer” entitled to protection of state deceptive trade practice and consumer protection acts, 63 ALR5th 1.

Validity, construction and application of Telephone Consumer Protection Act (47 USC § 227), 132 ALR Fed 625.

21 C.J.S. Credit Reporting Agencies; Consumer Protection § 1 et seq.